Utah statutes.
31A-27a-203.   Return of summons and summary hearing.
(1)  The receivership court shall hold a summary hearing at the time and date
for the return of summons on a petition to commence a formal delinquency
proceeding.
(2)  If a person is not served with summons on a petition to commence a formal
delinquency proceeding and fails to appear for the summary hearing, the
receivership court shall:
(a)  continue the summary hearing not more than ten days;
(b)  provide for alternative service of summons upon the person; and
(c)  extend any restraining order.
(3)  Upon a showing of good faith efforts to effect personal service upon a
person who fails to appear for a continued summary hearing, the receivership
court shall order notice of the petition to commence a formal delinquency
proceeding to be published.  The order and notice shall specify:
(a)  a return date not less than 10 nor more than 20 days after the day on
which notice is published; and
(b)  that the restraining order is extended to the continued hearing date.
(4)  If a person fails to appear for a summary hearing on a petition to
commence a formal delinquency proceeding after service of summons, the
receivership court shall enter judgment in favor of the commissioner against
that person.
(5) (a)  A person who appears for the summary hearing on a petition to
commence a formal delinquency proceeding shall file its answer at the hearing
and the receivership court shall:
(i)  determine whether to extend any temporary restraining order pending final
judgment; and
(ii)  set the case for trial on a date not more than ten days from the day on
which the summary hearing is held.
(b)  The receivership court may not grant a continuance for filing an answer.
